New York, session 2025-2026, S657.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 181 of the executive law is 2 amended by adding three new paragraphs (c), (d) and (e) to read as 3 follows: 4 (c) "Cost benefit analysis" shall mean, for tax expenditures claimed 5 by taxpayers subject to articles nine (other than section one hundred 6 eighty), nine-A, thirteen-A, twenty-eight, thirty-two, and thirty-three 7 of the tax law, a method of determining a tax expenditure's benefit to 8 New York state based on the tax expenditure recipient's projected job 9 creation or job retention and/or investment in the state versus the 10 total amount of revenues foregone under the tax expenditure. For tax 11 expenditures claimed by taxpayers subject to articles twenty-two and 12 thirty-one of the tax law, "cost benefit analysis" shall mean a method 13 of determining a tax expenditure's benefit to New York state based on 14 the amount of tax relief a tax expenditure provides to particular class- 15 es of persons or entities. 16 (d) "Cost benefit analysis ratio" shall mean the ratio calculated by a 17 cost benefit analysis of a tax expenditure. 18 (e) "Cost benefit analysis target ratio" shall mean the cost benefit 19 analysis ratio level that the governor deems to reflect a tax expendi- 20 ture's adequate level of benefit to New York state when taking into 21 consideration the amount of revenues the state foregoes because of a tax 22 expenditure and the amount of tax relief or job creation or job 23 retention or investment in the state provided or support by the tax 24 expenditure. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02490-01-5 S. 657 2 1 § 2. Paragraphs (f) and (g) of subdivision 2 of section 181 of the 2 executive law, as added by chapter 23 of the laws of 1990, are amended 3 and five new paragraphs (h), (i), (j), (k) and (l) are added to read as 4 follows: 5 (f) comment, if any, on the effectiveness and efficiency of other tax 6 expenditures; [and] 7 (g) general cautionary and advisory notes concerning limitations of 8 data, estimation procedures, sampling errors and imputed values, promi- 9 nently displayed[.]; and 10 (h) a cost benefit analysis of each tax expenditure; 11 (i) a comparison between each tax expenditure's cost benefit analysis 12 ratio and the tax expenditure's target ratio, along with an explanation 13 for any difference between the two ratios; 14 (j) an analysis of whether each tax expenditure has successfully 15 achieved the purpose for which the tax expenditure was enacted and 16 currently serves, including an analysis of the persons or entities that 17 are benefited by the tax expenditure; 18 (k) an explanation of the cost benefit analysis formula applied to 19 each tax expenditure; and 20 (l) an explanation of each tax expenditure's target ratio, including a 21 description of why the ratio reflects adequate levels of tax relief or 22 job creation or job retention or investment in the state. 23 § 3. Subdivision 3 of section 181 of the executive law is renumbered 24 subdivision 5 and two new subdivisions 3 and 4 are added to read as 25 follows: 26 3. Cost benefit analysis formula. The governor shall develop for each 27 tax expenditure a cost benefit analysis formula for determining the cost 28 benefit analysis ratio. 29 4. Cost benefit analysis target ratio. The governor shall determine 30 for each tax expenditure a cost benefit analysis target ratio. 31 § 4. This act shall take effect on the first of January next succeed- 32 ing the date on which it shall have become a law.